Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3615
Board; membership districts.

(1) The membership districts are as follows:

(a) District 1. The counties of Butler, Saunders, Douglas, Sarpy, Seward, Lancaster, Cass, Otoe, Saline, Jefferson, Gage, Johnson, Nemaha, Pawnee, and Richardson;

(b) District 2. The counties of Adams, Clay, Fillmore, Franklin, Webster, Nuckolls, and Thayer;

(c) District 3. The counties of Merrick, Polk, Hamilton, and York;

(d) District 4. The counties of Knox, Cedar, Dixon, Dakota, Pierce, Wayne, Thurston, Madison, Stanton, Cuming, Burt, Colfax, Dodge, and Washington;

(e) District 5. The counties of Sherman, Howard, Dawson, Buffalo, and Hall;

(f) District 6. The counties of Hayes, Frontier, Gosper, Phelps, Kearney, Hitchcock, Red Willow, Furnas, and Harlan;

(g) District 7. The counties of Boyd, Holt, Antelope, Garfield, Wheeler, Boone, Platte, Valley, Greeley, and Nance; and

(h) District 8. The counties of Sioux, Dawes, Box Butte, Sheridan, Scotts Bluff, Banner, Kimball, Morrill, Cheyenne, Garden, Deuel, Cherry, Keya Paha, Brown, Rock, Grant, Hooker, Thomas, Blaine, Loup, Arthur, McPherson, Logan, Custer, Keith, Lincoln, Perkins, Chase, and Dundy.

(2) The board may provide recommendations to the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature for potential changes to the list of counties that make up each membership district.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 9.